California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) The Deputy Director of the Office of Protective Services of the State Department of State Hospitals has oversight of all protective service components within the department’s law enforcement and fire protection services, including those at each state hospital. The deputy director shall be an experienced law enforcement officer who has completed the management training course prescribed by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, with extensive management experience directing uniformed peace officers and investigation officers.

(b) Wherever the term “Chief of
 the Office of Protective Services” is used in reference to the State Department of State Hospitals, the term shall be deemed to mean the Deputy Director of the Office of Protective Services of the State Department of State Hospitals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 424, Sec. 6.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4006.

With the approval of the Department of Finance and for use in the furtherance of the work of the State Department of State Hospitals, the director may accept any or all of the following:

(a) Grants of interest in real property.

(b) Grants of money received by this state from the United States, the expenditure of which is administered through or under the direction of any department of this state.

(c) Gifts of money from public agencies or from persons, organizations, or associations interested in the scientific, educational, charitable, or mental health
 fields.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 68.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4007.

The department may expend in accordance with law all money now or hereafter made available for its use, or for the administration of any statute administered by the department.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

4008.

(a) The department may expend money in accordance with law for the actual and necessary travel expenses of officers and employees of the department who are authorized to absent themselves from the State of California on official business.

(b) For the purposes of this section and of Sections 11030 and 11032 of the Government Code, the following constitutes, among other purposes, official business for officers and employees of the department for which these officers and employees shall be allowed actual and necessary traveling expenses when incurred either in or out of this state upon approval of the Governor and Director of Finance:

(1) Attending meetings of any national or regional association or organization having as its principal purpose the study of matters relating to the care and treatment of mentally ill persons.

(2) Conferring with officers or employees of the United States or other states, relative to problems of institutional care, treatment or management.

(3) Obtaining information from organizations, associations, or persons described in paragraphs (1) and (2) which would be useful in the conduct of the activities of the State Department of State Hospitals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 69.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4009.

The department may appoint and fix the compensation of such employees as it deems necessary, subject to the laws governing civil service.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1667.)
-------------------------------------------

4010.

Except as in this chapter otherwise prescribed, the provisions of the Government Code relating to state officers and departments shall apply to the State Department of State Hospitals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 70.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4011.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services has jurisdiction over the execution of the laws relating to the care, custody, and treatment of persons with mental health disorders only to the extent and in the manner provided in this code. The State Department of State Hospitals shall have jurisdiction over the execution of the laws relating to care and treatment of persons with mental health disorders under the custody of the State Department of State Hospitals.

(b) As used in this division, “establishment” and “institution” include every hospital, boarding home, or other place receiving or caring for persons with mental health disorders.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 59.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4011.5.

In counties where hospitals under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals are located, the state hospitals shall ensure that appropriate special education and related services, pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 56850) of Part 30 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, are provided eligible individuals with exceptional needs residing in state hospitals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 71.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4012.

The State Department of State Hospitals, the State Department of Health Care Services, and other departments as necessary, may:

(a) Disseminate educational information relating to the prevention, diagnosis, and treatment of mental illness.

(b) Upon request, advise a public officer, organization, or agency interested in the mental health of the people of the state.

(c) Conduct such educational and related work
 as will tend to encourage the development of proper mental health facilities throughout the state.

(d) Coordinate state activities involving other departments whose actions affect a person with a mental health condition.

(e) Coordinate with, and provide information to, other states and national organizations, on issues involving mental health.

(f) Disseminate information and federal and private foundation funding opportunities to a county or city that administers mental health programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 1.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4012.5.

The State Department of State Hospitals may obtain psychiatric, medical and other necessary aftercare services for judicially committed patients on leave of absence from state hospitals by contracting with any city, county, local health district, or other public officer or agency, or with any private person or agency to furnish such services to patients in or near the home community of the patient. Any city, county, local health district, or other public officer or agency authorized by law to provide mental health and aftercare services is authorized to enter such contracts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 73.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4015.

(a) The State Department of State Hospitals shall, in coordination with the task force described in subdivision (c) and with other state entities, including, but not limited to, the Department of General Services, the State Department of Developmental Services, the Secretary of State, and the California State Library, do all of the following:

(1) Conduct and complete inventories of all of the following:

(A) All materials and records necessary to create the most complete record of persons who died while residing at any state hospital as defined in Section 7200, or any developmental center as defined in Section 4440.

(B) Within existing resources, identify the location of all gravesites at existing state hospitals and developmental center lands and of gravesites not located on state lands but designated by the state for burial of state hospital or developmental center residents. This shall include the location of remains that may have been moved from their original burial site and the location of grave markers that may have been moved from gravesites.

(C) Within existing resources, identify the names of patients whose remains were donated for medical research, the entity to which the remains were donated, and the final disposition of those remains.

(2) Assist and cooperate with the California Memorial Project in conducting research regarding the records of deaths and burials of persons at state hospitals and developmental centers
 and cemeteries based on the grounds of these facilities. This assistance shall, subject to paragraph (3), include the granting of access to those state records as necessary to perform the inventories described in this section.

(3) Notwithstanding Sections 4514 and 5328 or any other provision of law regarding confidentiality of patient records, the information described in this section shall be limited to the name, date of birth, date of death, and photographic images of any person who died while in residency at any state hospital or developmental center and shall be made available for the purposes of the implementation of this section. The exportation and use of these records or photographic images from state facilities shall be limited to the information delineated within, and the purposes of, this section.

(4) Assist the California Memorial Project in developing a plan for the
 restoration of gravesites and cemeteries at state hospitals and developmental centers and gravesites not located on state lands but designated by the state for burial of state hospital or developmental center residents.

(5) Notwithstanding Sections 4514 and 5328 or any other provision of law governing the confidentiality of patient records, with respect to any monument or memorial erected consistent with this section, the department may include, if available, the name, date of birth, and date of death, of any person being memorialized who died while in residency at a state hospital or developmental center and who was buried by the state.

(6) Develop a protocol for the future interment of patients who die while residing at a state hospital or developmental center and are unclaimed by a family member.

(b) The
 department may develop a protocol to coordinate the efforts of the state entities described in subdivision (a).

(c) (1) The department shall establish a task force to provide leadership and direction in carrying out the activities described in this section. The task force shall consist of representatives selected by each of the following entities:

(A) The Peer Self-Advocacy Unit of Disability Rights California.

(B) California Network of Mental Health Clients.

(C) Capitol People First.

(2) To the extent that funding is available, task force members shall be reimbursed for necessary travel expenses associated with serving on the task force. When requested by a task
 force member with a disability, the state shall pay the cost of a facilitator chosen by the task force member.

(d) In implementing this section, the state shall make no structural changes to existing gravesites on state hospital or developmental center lands prior to the submission of, and which do not conform with, the restoration plan described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(e) Pursuant to the plan described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a), the department shall seek funding for this section from the California Cultural and Historical Endowment, in addition to any other resources that may be available to the department, excluding General Fund moneys, to restore, preserve, and memorialize the gravesite located at Napa State Hospital.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 74.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4016.

In every place in which a person with a mental health disorder may be involuntarily held, the persons confined therein shall be permitted access to, and examination or inspection of, copies of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 60.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4017.

(a) The department may provide information to the Controller to guide distribution of resources dedicated for mental health services under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 17600) of Part 5 of Division 9, and may distribute to a county or combination of counties acting jointly resources described in Part 2 (commencing with Section 5600) of Division 5, pursuant to Section 5701. 

(b) The department may contract with a county or combination of counties for services described in this division and Division 5 (commencing with Section 5000), to the extent that those services are funded directly by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 611, Sec. 16.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

4021.

(a) When the department has reason to believe that a person held in custody as having a mental health disorder is wrongfully deprived of his or her liberty, or is cruelly or negligently treated, or that inadequate provision is made for the skillful medical care, proper supervision, and safekeeping of that person, it may ascertain the facts. It may issue compulsory process for the attendance of witnesses and the production of papers, and may exercise the powers conferred upon a referee in a superior court. It may make such orders for the care and treatment of such person as it deems proper.

(b) Whenever the department undertakes an investigation into the general management and administration of an establishment or place of
 detention for persons with mental health disorders, it may give notice of that investigation to the Attorney General, who shall appear personally or by deputy, to examine witnesses in attendance and to assist the department in the exercise of the powers conferred upon it in this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 61.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4022.

When complaint is made to the department regarding the officers or management of a hospital or institution for persons with mental health disorders, or regarding the management of a person detained therein or regarding a person held in custody as having a mental health disorder, the department may, before making an examination regarding the complaint, require it to be made in writing and sworn to before an officer authorized to administer oaths. On receipt of such a complaint, sworn to if so required, the department shall direct that a copy of the complaint be served on the authorities of the hospital or institution or the person against whom complaint is made, together with notice of the time and place of the investigation, as the department directs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 62.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4023.

(a) The State Department of State Hospitals shall report to the agency described in subdivision (i) of Section 4900 the following incidents involving a resident of a state mental hospital:

(1) Any unexpected or suspicious death, regardless of whether the cause is immediately known.

(2) Any allegation of sexual assault, as defined in Section 15610.63,
 in which the alleged perpetrator is an employee or contractor of a state mental hospital or of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(3) Any report made to the local law enforcement agency in the jurisdiction in which the facility is located that involves physical abuse, as defined in Section 15610.63, in which a staff member is implicated.

(b) A report pursuant to this section shall be made no later than the close of the first business day following the discovery of the reportable incident.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 660, Sec. 1.   (SB 1051)   Effective September 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4023.6.

(a) The Office of Law Enforcement Support within the California Health and Human Services Agency shall investigate both of the following:

(1) Any incident at a developmental center or state hospital that involves developmental center or state hospital law enforcement personnel and that meets the criteria in Section 4023 or 4427.5, or alleges serious misconduct by law enforcement personnel.

(2) Any incident at a developmental center or state hospital that the Chief of the Office of Law Enforcement Support, the Secretary of the California Health and Human Services Agency, or the Undersecretary of the California Health and Human Services Agency directs the office to
 investigate.

(b) All incidents that meet the criteria of Section 4023 or 4427.5 shall be reported immediately to the Chief of the Office of Law Enforcement Support by the Chief of the facility’s Office of Protective Services.

(c) (1) Before adopting policies and procedures related to fulfilling the requirements of this section related to the Developmental Centers Division of the State Department of Developmental Services, the Office of Law Enforcement Support shall consult with the executive director of the protection and advocacy agency established by Section 4901, or his or her designee; the Executive Director of the Association of Regional Center Agencies, or his or her designee; and other advocates, including persons with developmental disabilities and their family members, on the unique characteristics of the persons residing in the developmental centers
 and the training needs of the staff who will be assigned to this unit.

(2) Before adopting policies and procedures related to fulfilling the requirements of this section related to the State Department of State Hospitals, the Office of Law Enforcement Support shall consult with the executive director of the protection and advocacy agency established by Section 4901, or his or her designee, and other advocates, including persons with mental health disabilities, former state hospital residents, and their family members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 26, Sec. 44.   (SB 85)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4023.7.

(a) The Office of Law Enforcement Support shall be responsible for contemporaneous oversight of investigations that (1) are conducted by the State Department of State Hospitals and involve an incident that meets the criteria of Section 4023, and (2) are conducted by the State Department of Developmental Services and involve an incident that meets the criteria of Section 4427.5.

(b) Upon completion of a review, the Office of Law Enforcement Support shall prepare a written incident report, which shall be held as confidential.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 26, Sec. 45.   (SB 85)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4023.8.

(a) (1) Commencing October 1, 2016, the Office of Law Enforcement Support shall issue regular reports, no less than semiannually, to the Governor, the appropriate policy and budget committees of the Legislature, and the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, summarizing the investigations it conducted pursuant to Section 4023.6 and its oversight of investigations pursuant to Section 4023.7. Reports encompassing data from January through June, inclusive, shall be made on October 1 of each year, and reports encompassing data from July to December, inclusive, shall be made on March 1 of each year.

(2) The reports required by paragraph (1) shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The number, type, and disposition of investigations of incidents.

(B) A synopsis of each investigation reviewed by the Office of Law Enforcement Support.

(C) An assessment of the quality of each investigation, the appropriateness of any disciplinary actions, the Office of Law Enforcement Support’s recommendations regarding the disposition in the case and the level of disciplinary action, and the degree to which the agency’s authorities agreed with the Office of Law Enforcement Support’s recommendations regarding disposition and level of discipline.

(D) The report of any settlement and whether the Office of Law Enforcement Support concurred with the settlement.

(E) The extent to which any
 disciplinary action was modified after imposition.

(F) Timeliness of investigations and completion of investigation reports.

(G) The number of reports made to an individual’s licensing board, including, but not limited to, the Medical Board of California, the Board of Registered Nursing, the Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California, or the California State Board of Pharmacy, in cases involving serious or criminal misconduct by the individual.

(H) The number of investigations referred for criminal prosecution and employee disciplinary action and the outcomes of those cases.

(I) The adequacy of the State Department of State Hospitals’ and the Developmental Centers Division of the State Department of Developmental
 Services’ systems for tracking patterns and monitoring investigation outcomes and employee compliance with training requirements.

(3) The reports required by paragraph (1) shall be in a form that does not identify the agency employees involved in the alleged misconduct.

(4) The reports required by paragraph (1) shall be posted on the Office of Law Enforcement Support’s Internet Web site and otherwise made available to the public upon their release to the Governor and the Legislature.

(b) The protection and advocacy agency established by Section 4901 shall have access to the reports issued pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and all supporting materials except personnel records.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 26, Sec. 46.   (SB 85)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4024.

The State Department of State Hospitals proposed allocations for level-of-care staffing in state hospitals that serve persons with mental disabilities shall be submitted to the Department of Finance for review and approval in July and again on a quarterly basis. Each quarterly report shall include an analysis of client characteristics of admissions and discharges in addition to information on any changes in characteristics of current residents.

The State Department of State Hospitals shall submit by January 1 and May 1 to the Department of Finance for its approval: (a) all assumptions underlying estimates of state hospital mentally disabled population; and (b) a comparison of the actual and estimated population levels
 for the year to date. If the actual population differs from the estimated population by 50 or more, the department shall include in its reports an analysis of the causes of the change and the fiscal impact. The Department of Finance shall approve or modify the assumptions underlying all population estimates within 15 working days of their submission. If the Department of Finance does not approve or modify the assumptions by that date, the assumptions, as presented by the submitting department, shall be deemed to be accepted by the Department of Finance as of that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 275, Sec. 9.   (AB 1420)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4024.7.

The Governor or the Director of Health Care Services shall appoint, subject to confirmation by the Senate, a Deputy Director of Mental Health and Substance Use Disorder Services of the State Department of Health Care Services. The salary for the deputy director shall be fixed in accordance with law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 23, Sec. 47.   (AB 1467)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4025.

Charges made by the department for the care and treatment of each patient in a facility maintained by the department shall not exceed the actual cost thereof as determined by the director in accordance with standard accounting practices. The director is not prohibited from including the amount of expenditures for capital outlay or the interest thereon, or both, in his determination of actual cost.

As used in this section, the terms “care” and “care and treatment” include care, treatment, support, maintenance, and other services rendered by the department to a patient in the state hospital or other facility maintained by or under the jurisdiction of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

4027.

The State Department of State Hospitals may adopt regulations concerning patients’ rights and related procedures applicable to the inpatient treatment of mentally ill offenders receiving treatment pursuant to Sections 1026, 1026.2, 1364, 1370, 1610, and 2684 of the Penal Code, Section 1756 of this code, persons receiving treatment as mentally disordered sex offenders, and inmates of jail psychiatric units.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 24, Sec. 76.   (AB 1470)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Planning, Research, Evaluation and Quality Assurance [4030. - 4061.]



  ARTICLE 1. Planning, Research, Evaluation, and Quality Assurance [4030. - 4033.]

4030.

The Director of Health Care Services shall organize appropriate staff of the department to ensure implementation of the planning, research, evaluation, technical assistance, and quality assurance responsibilities set forth in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 46.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4031.

The State Department of Health Care Services shall, to the extent resources are available, do all of the following:

(a) Conduct, sponsor, coordinate, and disseminate results of research and evaluation directed to the public policy issues entailed in the selection of resource utilization and service delivery in the state.

(b) Make available technical assistance to local mental health programs incorporating the results of research, evaluation, and quality assurance to local mental health
 programs.

(c) Implement a system of required performance reporting by local mental health programs.

(d) Perform any other activities useful to improving and maintaining the quality of community mental health programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 47.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4032.

The State Department of Health Care Services shall, when appropriate, give and receive grants and contracts for research, evaluation, and quality assurance efforts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 48.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4033.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services shall, to the extent resources are available, comply with the Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration federal planning requirements. The department shall update and issue a state plan, which may also be any federally required state service plan, so a citizen may be informed regarding the implementation of, and long-range goals for, programs to serve
 a person with a mental health condition in the state. The department shall gather information from counties necessary to comply with this section.

(b) (1) If the State Department of Health Care Services makes a decision not to comply with any Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration federal planning requirement to which this section applies, the State Department of Health Care Services shall submit the decision, for consultation, to the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, the California Behavioral Health Planning Council, and affected mental health entities.

(2) The State Department of Health Care Services shall not implement any decision not to comply with the Substance Abuse and Mental Health
 Services Administration federal planning requirements sooner than 30 days after notification of that decision, in writing, by the Department of Finance, to the chairperson of the committee in each house of the Legislature that considers appropriations, and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 2.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Research and Evaluation [4040. - 4046.]

4040.

The State Department of Health Care Services or State Department of State Hospitals may conduct, or contract for, research or evaluation studies that have application to mental health policy and management issues. In selecting areas for study the department shall be guided by the information needs of state and local policymakers and managers, and suggestions from the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 14.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4041.

The department shall serve as a clearinghouse for information on research and evaluation studies relevant to mental health. The department shall review and disseminate the results of local, state, and national research and evaluation studies that have important implications for mental health policy or management.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1393.)
-------------------------------------------

4042.

The State Department of State Hospitals shall cooperate and coordinate with other state and local agencies engaged in research and evaluation studies. Effort shall be made to coordinate with research, evaluation, and demonstration efforts of local mental health programs, state hospitals serving persons with mental health disorders, the Department of Rehabilitation, the State Department of Developmental Services, the State Department of Health Care Services, universities, and other special projects conducted or contracted for by the State Department of State Hospitals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 63.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4043.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department provide leadership in the establishment and funding of mental health research projects. The projects shall lead to better understanding of the etiology of serious mental illness and the development of treatment alternatives necessary to meet the needs of the citizens of this state. 

(b) The director shall appoint a Mental Health Research Advisory Committee. The committee shall consult with program administrators, providers, consumers, families, and research scientists. The committee shall advise and assist the director in establishing research priorities and in other research related activities as appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 24.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

4044.

Research performed pursuant to this chapter shall have as a priority serious mental disorders. Research shall be conducted in, or in collaboration with, state or local mental health program facilities that serve public needs. In order to preserve continuity, research programs may be funded for up to five years depending upon the nature of the project and availability of funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 25.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

4045.

In order to improve the quality of mental health care in this state, a portion of the funding for research pursuant to this chapter shall be used to provide technical advice, consultation, and education on diagnosis and treatment within the public mental health system upon request of a county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 26.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

4046.

Notwithstanding any other law, designated staff of the State Department of State Hospitals shall have access to state summary criminal history information for patients and formerly committed patients necessary to submit legislative reports for facility and community treatment programs, as well as for research, evaluation, and data analytics. Criminal history records may include individually disaggregated data of arrests, charging offenses, pretrial proceedings, the nature and disposition of criminal charges, and information pertaining to sentencing, incarceration, rehabilitation, and release. Information from criminal history records provided pursuant to this section shall not be used for any purpose other than those specified in this article. The State Department of State Hospitals and the Department of Corrections and
 Rehabilitation may exchange criminal identification and information numbers (CII) for the purposes of research and program evaluation under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 65.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Technical Assistance [4050. - 4061.]

4050.

The State Department of Health Care Services shall provide, to the extent resources are available, technical assistance, through its own staff, or by contract, to county mental health programs and other local mental health agencies in the areas of program operations, research, evaluation, demonstration, or quality assurance projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 51.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4051.

The State Department of Health Care Services shall, to the extent resources are available, provide program development guidelines, evaluation models, and operational assistance on all aspects of services to a person with a mental illness of any age. These services include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Self-help programs.

(b) Housing development.

(c) Disaster preparation.

(d) Vocational services.

(e) Regional programs.

(f) Multiple diagnosis programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 3.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4052.

The State Department of Health Care Services shall, to the extent resources are available, provide training in performance standards, model programs, cultural competency, and program development.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 53.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4060.

The State Department of Health Care Services shall, in order to implement Section 4050, utilize a meaningful decisionmaking process that
 includes local mental health directors and representatives of local mental health boards as well as other stakeholders as determined by the department. The purpose of this collaboration shall be to promote effective and efficient quality mental health services to the residents of the state under the realigned mental health system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 54.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

4061.

(a) The State Department of Health Care Services shall utilize a joint state-county decisionmaking process to determine the appropriate use of state and local training, technical assistance, and regulatory resources to meet the mission and goals of the state’s mental health and substance use disorder services system. The department shall use the decisionmaking collaborative process required by this section in all of the following areas:

(1) Providing technical assistance to personnel of the State Department of Health Care Services and local behavioral health, mental health, and substance use disorder services departments through direction of existing state and local mental health and substance use disorder services staff and
 other resources.

(2) Analyzing mental health and substance use disorder programs, policies, and procedures.

(3) Providing forums on specific topics as they relate to the following:

(A) Identifying current level of services.

(B) Evaluating existing needs and gaps in current services.

(C) Developing strategies for achieving statewide goals and objectives in the provision of services for the specific area.

(D) Developing plans to accomplish the identified goals and objectives.

(4) Providing forums on policy development and direction with respect to mental health
 and substance use disorder program operations and clinical issues.

(5) Identifying and funding a statewide training and technical assistance entity jointly governed by local behavioral health, mental health, and substance use disorder services directors and mental health and substance use disorder constituency representation, which can do all of the following:

(A) Coordinate state and local resources to support training and technical assistance to promote quality mental health and substance use disorder programs.

(B) Coordinate training and technical assistance to ensure efficient and effective program development.

(C) Provide essential training and technical assistance, as determined by the state-county decisionmaking process.

(b) Local behavioral health, mental health, and substance use disorder services board members shall be included in discussions pursuant to Section 4060 when the following areas are discussed:

(1) Training and education program recommendations.

(2) Establishment of statewide forums for all organizations and individuals involved in mental health and substance use disorder matters to meet and discuss program and policy issues.

(3) Distribution of information between the state, local mental health and substance use disorder programs, local mental health and substance use disorder services boards, and other organizations as appropriate.

(c) The State Department of Health Care Services and local
 mental health and substance use disorder services departments may provide staff or other resources, including travel reimbursement, for consultant and advisory services; for the training of personnel, board members, or consumers and families in state and local programs and in educational institutions and field training centers approved by the department; and for the establishment and maintenance of field training centers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 31, Sec. 44.   (SB 857)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Facility Licensing, Program Certification, and Ratesetting [4080. - 4096.6.]



  ARTICLE 3. Psychiatric Health Facilities and Psychiatric Residential Treatment Facilities [4080. - 4083.]

4080.

(a) Psychiatric health facilities, as defined in Section 1250.2 of the Health and Safety Code, shall only be licensed by the State Department of Health Care Services subsequent to application by counties, county contract providers, or other organizations pursuant to this part.

(b) (1) For counties or county contract providers that choose to apply, the local behavioral health director shall first present to the local behavioral health advisory board for its review an explanation of the need for the facility and a description of the services to be provided. The local behavioral health director shall then submit to the governing body the explanation and description.
 The governing body, upon its approval, may submit the application to the State Department of Health Care Services.

(2) Other organizations that will be applying for licensure and do not intend to use any Bronzan-McCorquodale funds pursuant to Section 5707 shall submit to the local behavioral health